Alabama, session 2026rs, HB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) COST-SHARING REQUIREMENT. A deductible, copayment,
coinsurance, or similar expense borne by the insured for a
covered benefit under a health benefit plan.
(2) DIAGNOSTIC BREAST EXAMINATION. A medically
necessary and appropriate examination of the breast that
includes, but is not limited to, contrast-enhanced
mammography, diagnostic mammography, breast magnetic resonance
imaging, breast ultrasound, or molecular breast imaging that
is used to:
a. Evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a
screening examination for breast cancer; or
b. Evaluate an abnormality detected by another means of
examination.
(3) HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN. a. Any plan, policy, or
contract issued, delivered, or renewed in this state that
provides health coverage that includes payment for
hospitalization, physician care, treatment, surgery, therapy,
Page 1

hospitalization, physician care, treatment, surgery, therapy,
HB300 Enrolled
drugs, equipment, and any other medical expense, regardless of
the following:
1. Whether the plan, policy, or contract is provided by
a health care insurer; health maintenance organization
established under Chapter 21A of Title 27, Code of Alabama
1975; health care services plan established under Chapter 20
of Title 10A, Code of Alabama 1975; a nonprofit agricultural
organization that provides health benefits to its members
under Chapter 33 of Title 2, Code of Alabama 1975; or any
other entity that pays for, purchases, or reimburses for
health care services.
2. Whether the plan is for a group or an individual.
b. The term does not include accident-only, specified
disease, individual hospital indemnity, credit, dental-only,
Medicare supplement, long-term care, disability income, or
other limited benefit health insurance policies, or coverage
issued as supplemental to liability insurance, workers'
compensation, or automobile medical payment insurance.
(4) SUPPLEMENTAL BREAST EXAMINATION. A medically
necessary and appropriate examination of the breast that
includes, but is not limited to, contrast-enhanced
mammography, breast magnetic resonance imaging, breast
ultrasound, or molecular breast imaging that is used to screen
for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or
suspected, based on personal or family medical history or
additional factors that increase the risk of breast cancer,
including dense tissue, on the recommendation of a physician.
(b) A health benefit plan that pays for, purchases, or
Page 2

(b) A health benefit plan that pays for, purchases, or
HB300 Enrolled
furnishes health care services to individuals who reside in
this state, and which provides coverage for a supplemental
breast examination or a diagnostic breast examination, may not
impose any cost-sharing requirement on an enrollee for a
supplemental breast examination or diagnostic breast
examination.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 3

1, 2027.
HB300 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House, as amended 17-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed



Page 4